Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB422.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 439.3406 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The board shall order mandatory reentry supervision six (6) months prior to the projected completion date of
an inmate's sentence for an inmate who has not been granted discretionary parole.
(2) [The provisions of subsection (1) of ]This section shall not apply to an inmate who:
(a) Is not eligible for parole by statute;
(b) Has been convicted of a capital offense or a Class A felony;
(c) Has previously been convicted of two (2) or more offenses that would classify him or her as a violent
offender under KRS 439.3401;
(d) Has a maximum or close security classification as defined by administrative regulations promulgated by
the department;
(e)[(d)] Has been sentenced to two (2) years or less of incarceration;
(f)[(e)] Is subject to the provisions of KRS 532.043;
(g)[(f)] Has six (6) months or less to be served after his or her sentencing by a court[ or recommitment to
prison for a violation of probation, shock probation, parole, or conditional discharge];
(h)[(g)] Has been[If] recommitted to prison for a violation of probation, shock probation, parole, or
conditional discharge[, has not served at least six (6) months since being recommitted]; or
(i)[(h)] Has twice been released on mandatory reentry supervision.
(3) An inmate granted mandatory reentry supervision pursuant to this section may be returned by the board to
prison for violation of the conditions of supervision and shall not again be eligible for mandatory reentry
supervision during the same period of incarceration.
(4) An inmate released to mandatory reentry supervision shall be considered to be released on parole.
(5) Mandatory reentry supervision is not a commutation of sentence or any other form of clemency.
(6) A[No] hearing shall not be required for the board to order an inmate to mandatory reentry supervision pursuant
to subsection (1) of this section. Terms of supervision for inmates released on mandatory reentry supervision
shall be established as follows:
(a) 1. The board shall promulgate[adopt] administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter
13A establishing general conditions applicable to each inmate ordered to mandatory reentry
supervision pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
2. If an inmate is ordered to mandatory reentry supervision, the board's order shall:
a. Set forth the general conditions; and[ shall]
b. Require the inmate to comply with the general conditions and any requirements imposed
by the department in accordance with this section;
(b) Upon intake of an inmate ordered to mandatory reentry supervision by the board, the department shall
use the results of the risk and needs assessment administered pursuant to KRS 439.3104(1) to establish
appropriate terms and conditions of supervision, taking into consideration the level of risk to public
safety, criminal risk factors, and the need for treatment and other interventions. The terms and
conditions imposed by the department under this paragraph shall not conflict with the general
conditions adopted by the board pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection; and
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) The powers and duties assigned to the commissioner in relation to probation or parole under KRS
439.470 shall be assigned to the commissioner in relation to mandatory reentry supervision.
(7) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, the period of mandatory reentry supervision shall conclude upon
completion of the individual's minimum expiration of sentence.
(8) If the board issues a warrant for the arrest of an inmate for absconding from supervision during the mandatory
reentry supervision period, and the inmate is subsequently returned to prison as a violator of conditions of
supervision for absconding, the inmate shall not receive credit toward the remainder of his or her sentence for
the time spent absconding.
(9) The department shall report the results of the mandatory reentry supervision program to the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Judiciary or the Senate and House
Standing Committees on Judiciary, as appropriate, by February 1 of each year[, 2015].
Section 2. KRS 504.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is not responsible for criminal conduct if at the time of the[such] conduct, as a result of mental
illness or intellectual disability, he or she lacks substantial capacity [either ]to appreciate the nature and
quality of[criminality of] his or her conduct[ or to conform his conduct to the requirements of law].
(2) As used in this chapter, the term "mental illness or intellectual disability" does not include an abnormality
manifested only by repeated criminal or otherwise antisocial conduct.
(3) A defendant may prove mental illness or intellectual disability, as used in this section, in exculpation of
criminal conduct.
Section 3. KRS 504.060 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Department" means the Department of Corrections;
(2) "Examiner" means a psychologist or psychiatrist who examines, treats, or reports on a defendant's mental
condition as required by this chapter;
(3) "Forensic psychiatric facility" means a mental institution or facility, or part thereof, designated by the
secretary for the purpose and function of providing inpatient evaluation, care, and treatment for [mentally ill
persons or ]individuals with an intellectual disability or a mental illness who have been charged with or
convicted of a felony;
(4) "Foreseeable future" means not more than three hundred sixty (360) days;
(5) "Incompetency to stand trial" means, as a result of mental condition, lack of capacity to appreciate the nature
and consequences of the proceedings against one or to participate rationally in one's own defense;
(6) "Individual with an intellectual disability" means an individual with significantly subaverage general
intellectual functioning existing concurrently with deficits in adaptive behavior and manifested during the
developmental period and is a condition which may exist concurrently with mental illness or insanity;
(7) "Insanity" means, as a result of mental illness or intellectual disability[condition], lack of substantial capacity
[either ]to appreciate the nature and quality[criminality] of one's conduct[ or to conform one's conduct to the
requirements of law];
(8) "Mental illness" means substantially impaired capacity to use self-control, judgment, or discretion in the
conduct of one's affairs and social relations, associated with maladaptive behavior or recognized emotional
symptoms where impaired capacity, maladaptive behavior, or emotional symptoms can be related to
physiological, psychological, or social factors;
(9) "Psychiatrist" means a physician licensed pursuant to KRS Chapter 311 who is certified or eligible to apply for
certification by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology, Inc.;
(10) "Psychologist" means a person licensed at the doctoral level pursuant to KRS Chapter 319 who has been
designated by the Kentucky Board of Examiners of Psychology as competent to perform examinations;
(11) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;
(12) "Treatment":

CHAPTER 14 3
(a) Means medication or counseling, therapy, psychotherapy, and other professional services provided by
or at the direction of psychologists or psychiatrists; and[. "Treatment"]
(b) Shall not include electroshock therapy or psychosurgery; and
(13) "Treatment facility" means an institution or part thereof, approved by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services, which provides evaluation, care, and treatment for insane or [mentally ill persons or ]individuals with
an intellectual disability or a mental illness on an inpatient or outpatient basis.
Section 4. KRS 504.120 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, in cases in which the defendant provides evidence at trial
of his or her mental illness or insanity at the time of the offense, the jury or court may find the defendant:
(a)[(1)] Guilty;
(b)[(2)] Not guilty;
(c)[(3)] Not guilty by reason of insanity at the time of the offense; or
(d)[(4)] Guilty but mentally ill at the time of the offense.
(2) A jury or court shall not return a verdict that finds the defendant:
(a) For one (1) count, not guilty by reason of insanity at the time of the offense; and
(b) For any other count arising out of a single course of conduct and tried during the same trial, guilty
or guilty but mentally ill at the time of the offense.
(3) The court shall instruct the jury on the prohibition established in subsection (2) of this section.
Section 5. KRS 504.150 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The court shall sentence a defendant found guilty but mentally ill at the time of the offense to the local
jail or to the department[ of Corrections] in the same manner as a defendant found guilty.
(b) If the defendant is found guilty but mentally ill, treatment shall be provided the defendant until the
treating professional determines that the treatment is no longer necessary or until expiration of his or
her sentence, whichever occurs first.
(c) If the treating professional determines that treatment is still necessary upon expiration of the
defendant's sentence, the treating professional or the Commonwealth shall petition the sentencing
court for:
1. Involuntary hospitalization or admission under KRS Chapter 202A or 202B; or
2. Court-ordered community-based outpatient treatment under KRS Chapter 202A.
(2) Treatment shall be a condition of probation, shock probation, conditional discharge, parole, or conditional
release so long as the defendant requires treatment for his or her mental illness in the opinion of his or her
treating professional.
Section 6. This Act may be cited as Logan's Law.
Signed by Governor April 2, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version